Hawaii statutes.
[PART
IVA.] EXOTIC ANIMALS; REIMBURSABLE INSPECTION

[§159-31] Inspection of exotic animals.
Persons desiring certification as to wholesomeness and unadulteration for meat
and meat products derived from exotic animals may request the department to
conduct an inspection under this chapter. [L 1990, c 139, pt of §1; am L 1991,
c 88, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next